Hawaii statutes.
[§508C-4] Contents of environmental
covenant. (a) An environmental covenant shall:

(1) State that the instrument is an environmental
covenant executed pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Contain a legally sufficient description of the
real property subject to the covenant;

(3) Describe the activity and use limitations on the
real property;

(4) Include at least one holder to be effective;

(5) Identify every holder;

(6) Be signed by the agency, every holder, and unless
waived by the agency, every owner of the fee simple interest of the real
property subject to the covenant; and

(7) Identify the name and location of any
administrative record for the environmental response project reflected in the
environmental covenant.

(b) In addition to the information required by
subsection (a), an environmental covenant may contain other information,
restrictions, and requirements agreed to by the persons who signed it,
including:

(1) Requirements for notice:

(A) Following transfer of a specified
interest in;

(B) Concerning proposed changes in use of;

(C) Of applications for building permits for;
or

(D) Of proposals for any site work affecting
the contamination on,

the property subject to the covenant;

(2) Requirements for periodic reporting describing
compliance with the covenant;

(3) Rights of access to the property granted in
connection with implementation or enforcement of the covenant;

(4) A brief narrative description of the
contamination and remedy, including the contaminants of concern, the pathways
of exposure, limits on exposure, and the location and extent of the
contamination;

(5) Limitation on amendment or termination of the
covenant in addition to those contained in sections 508C‑9 and 508C‑10;
and

(6) Rights of the holder in addition to the right to
enforce the covenant pursuant to section 508C‑11.

(c) In addition to other conditions for its
approval of an environmental covenant, the agency may require the persons
specified by the agency who have interests in the real property to sign the covenant.
[L 2006, c 279, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next